Washington statutes.
RCW 36.135.040

Public works projects—Prioritization process.

(1) County legislative authorities utilizing or providing money under this chapter must develop a prioritization process for funding public works projects that gives priority to projects necessary to address public health needs, substantial environmental degradation, or increases existing capacity necessary to accommodate projected population and employment growth. This prioritization process must be:

(a) Completed collaboratively with public works directors of local governments within the county;

(b) Documented in the form of written findings produced by the county; and

(c) Revised periodically according to a schedule developed by the county and the public works directors.

(2) In addition to the requirements under subsection (1) of this section, legislative authorities providing funding to other local governments under this chapter must consider, through a competitive application process, the following factors in assigning a priority to and funding a project:

(a) Whether the local government applying for assistance has experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or emergency public works needs;

(b) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the health and safety of a great number of citizens;

(c) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local government and amount of loan money available;

(d) The number of communities served by or funding the project;

(e) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement, or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in violation of health and safety standards;

(f) The number of additional housing units estimated to be achieved by funding the project;

(g) The additional jobs estimated to be achieved by funding the project; and

(h) Other criteria the county legislative authority deems appropriate.

[ 2009 c 45 s 4.]